Hawaii statutes.
[§269-170] Green infrastructure loan
program order; application. (a) The authority shall submit an application
to the public utilities commission for the use or other disposition of amounts
deposited or held in the green infrastructure special fund pursuant to section
196-65 prior to the allocation, use, expenditure, or other disposition of any
such amounts; provided that this subsection shall not apply to the expenditure
of amounts deposited or held in the green infrastructure special fund that have
been reviewed and approved by the public utilities commission for operational
or administrative expenses of the authority pursuant to section 196-64.

(b) An application submitted by the authority
to the public utilities commission under this section shall include the
following:

(1) A description of each project, program, financing
agreement, or other arrangement for which the authority seeks to allocate, use,
expend, or otherwise dispose of amounts deposited or held in the green
infrastructure special fund, including:

(A) The clean energy technology, demand
response technology, and energy use reduction and demand side management
infrastructure, programs, and services to be financed;

(B) A description of the parties, both direct
and incidental, intended to benefit from any financing made in connection with
the green infrastructure special fund amounts requested by the authority in an
application submitted to the public utilities commission under this section;

(C) A description of the loan programs or other
arrangements designed, established, identified, agreed to, agreed to in
principle, continued, carried over, or otherwise intended to be effectuated for
the use of the green infrastructure special fund amounts requested by the
authority in an application submitted to the public utilities commission under
this section; and

(D) Any and all funding or credit sources
identified, pledged, dedicated, or otherwise provided to supplement the green
infrastructure special fund amounts requested by the authority in an
application submitted to the public utilities commission under this section;

(2) Minimum lending, crediting, or investing criteria
in relation to each project, program, financing agreement, or other arrangement
described in an application submitted to the public utilities commission under
this section;

(3) A description of the repayment processes,
mechanisms, and applicable calculations for each project, program, financing
agreement, or other arrangement described in an application submitted to the public
utilities commission under this section;

(4) An explanation of the anticipated impacts and
benefits to electric utility ratepayers of any project, program, financing
agreement, or other arrangement described under an application submitted by the
authority to the public utilities commission under this section; and

(5) Any other additional information determined to be
necessary by the public utilities commission upon the review of an application
submitted or resubmitted by the authority under this section. [L 2013, c 211,
pt of §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next